Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Military Department from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to support
nonprofit organizations dedicated to organizing events for the
commissioning of the U.S. naval vessel USS Oklahoma.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

Req. No. 15938 Page 1

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15938 MAH 01/15/26




















Req. No. 15938 Page 2